Wisconsin, session 2025, SB96.
do enact as follows:SB96,11Section 1. 77.54 (71) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB96,2,4277.54 (71) (a) The sales price from the sale of electricity delivered or placed by 3a Level 3 charger of an electric vehicle charging station, as defined in s. 77.997 (1) 4(2), into the battery or other energy storage device of an electric vehicle.SB96,25Section 2. 77.54 (71) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB96,2,9677.54 (71) (b) The sales price from the sale of electricity delivered or placed by 7a Level 1 charger or a Level 2 charger installed on or after March 22, 2024, of an 8electric vehicle charging station, as defined in s. 77.997 (1) (2), into the battery or 9other energy storage device of an electric vehicle.SB96,310Section 3. 77.997 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 77.997 (2).SB96,411Section 4. 77.997 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB96,2,121277.997 (1m) “Electric vehicle” has the meaning given in 23 CFR 680.104.SB96,513Section 5. 77.9972 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB96,2,161477.9972 (1) (b) No tax under this section applies to electricity delivered or 15placed by a Level 3 any charger of an electric vehicle charging station located at a 16residence.SB96,617Section 6. 77.9973 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB96,2,211877.9973 (2) Section 77.76 (1) and (2), as it applies to the taxes under subch. V, 19applies to the tax under this subchapter, except that ss. 77.52 (7), 77.58 (3) (a), and 2077.61 (19m) (a), as they apply to a single-owner entity that is disregarded as a 21separate entity under ch. 71, do not apply to this subchapter.SB96,722Section 7. Initial applicability.SB96,3,21(1) The treatment of s. 77.9972 (1) (b) first applies retroactively to electricity 2delivered or placed on January 1, 2025.SB96,3,33